Utah statutes.
73-18c-302.   Operating motorboats without owner's or operator's security -- Penalty.

(1)  Any owner of a motorboat on which owner's or operator's security is required under Section 73-18c-301, who operates the motorboat or permits it to be operated on waters of the state without owner's security being in effect is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  Any other person who operates a motorboat upon waters of the state with the knowledge that the owner does not have owner's security in effect for the motorboat is also guilty of a class B misdemeanor, unless that person has in effect owner's or operator's security on a Utah-registered motorboat or its equivalent that covers the operation, by him or her, of the motorboat in question.



Amended by Chapter 211, 2006 General Session

